Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2043.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the purpose of the transportation system is to support the mobility needs of Washington residents, as well as to sustain and foster the economic activity and growth of the state. The legislature recognizes that the transportation system has pressing near, mid, and long-term needs that necessitate reliance on reliable funding sources. The legislature also recognizes that the state and nation have faced dramatically increasing construction costs and declining fuel tax revenue due to the increasing fuel economy of motor vehicles. The legislature therefore intends to establish additional transportation revenue sources from a range of sources to ensure that Washington's transportation system continues to deliver the level of service that residents depend on and that fuels the state's economy and growth.--- END ---